Arkansas, session 2025, SB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, Subchapter 3 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-17-311. School chaplain — Definitions.
(a)(1) A public school may employ or accept as a volunteer a school
chaplain to provide support, services, and programs for enrolled students,
staff employed by the public school, and parents of enrolled students.
(2) A public school that chooses to employ or accept as a
volunteer a school chaplain under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
determine the selection criteria for the school chaplain.
(3) A public school may employ or accept as a volunteer more
than one (1) school chaplain under this section.
(b) A school chaplain employed by or volunteering at a public school
under this section is not required to be credentialed by the Department of
Education.
(c)(1) Before a public school may employ or accept as a volunteer a
school chaplain under this section, the public school shall require the
school chaplain to authorize release to the Division of Elementary and
*TNL067*
01/30/2025 3:47:25 PM TNL067

SB164
Secondary Education the results of:
(A) Statewide and nationwide criminal records checks by
the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police, which
conform to the applicable federal standards and include the taking of the
school chaplain's fingerprints; and
(B) A Child Maltreatment Central Registry check by the
Department of Human Services.
(2) Upon completion of the statewide and nationwide criminal
records checks and the Child Maltreatment Central Registry check, the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police or the
Department of Human Services shall forward all releasable information to the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(3) Within thirty (30) days of receiving all releasable
information that has been forwarded by the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police and the Department of Human Services under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall inform the public school whether or not the affected
applicant is eligible to be employed by or volunteer at the public school.
(4) A public school that chooses to employ or accept as a
volunteer a school chaplain under this section shall pay the full cost of the
criminal records and Child Maltreatment Central Registry checks.
(5) A public school shall not employ or accept as a volunteer a
school chaplain who has registered or is required to register as a sex
offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq.
(d)(1) A person shall not have a cause of action against a school
chaplain employed by or volunteering at a public school under this section
made in the course and scope of the school chaplain's duties as described in
subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(2) However, the immunity from liability under subdivision
(d)(1) shall not apply to an action taken or statement made by a school
chaplain employed by or volunteering at a public school if the action taken
or statement made was maliciously, willfully, and deliberately intended to
cause harm to harass or intimidate an individual seeking support, services,
or programs from the school chaplain.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) "Parent" means a parent, legal guardian, or person standing
01/30/2025 3:47:25 PM TNL067

SB164
in loco parentis to a student;
(2) "Public school" means:
(A) A school operated by a public school district; or
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school;
(3)(A) "Religious organization" means an entity that functions
primarily to provide religious ministries to individuals as a church, an
integrated auxiliary of a church, or a convention or an association of
churches, and is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3),
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) A religious organization shall:
(i) Include an entity that has:
(a) Truly and sincerely held religious beliefs
or creeds; and
(b) Practices and rituals that are not
construed as illegal or contrary to clearly defined public policy; and
(ii) Possess ecclesiastical authority to grant and
withdraw initial and subsequent ecclesiastical endorsement for a chaplain.
(C) As used in subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section,
"church" does not denote a certain belief system, but is distinguished from
other types of religious organizations; and
(4) "School chaplain" means a member of the clergy who is
credentialed by a religious organization to:
(A) Function in a pluralistic environment; and
(B) Directly and indirectly support the free exercise of
religion by all individuals in schools.











01/30/2025 3:47:25 PM TNL067